Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2365.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) South central regional mental health hospital is a
state hospital that shall be open for the reception of patients, under the
same rules and regulations as provided for by law for the government and
regulation of the other state hospitals.
(b) There is hereby created in the state treasury the south central
regional mental health hospital fee fund. Such fund shall be administered
by the Kansas department for aging and disability services. The
superintendent of south central regional mental health hospital shall remit
all moneys received by or for the superintendent from charges made under
K.S.A. 59-2006, and amendments thereto, and other operations of such
institution to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of
K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such
remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state
treasury to the credit of the south central regional mental health hospital
fee fund. All expenditures from such fund shall be made in accordance
with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by such superintendent or by
a person or persons designated by the superintendent.
(c) As authorized by section 74(a) of chapter 81 of the 2022 Session
Laws of Kansas and Sec. 28(c) of chapter 97 of the 2022 Session Laws of
Kansas, a regional state psychiatric hospital shall be established in
Wichita, Kansas, for Sedgwick county and the surrounding regional area to
expand access to mental health beds in south-central Kansas.

HB 2365—Am. by SC 2
(d) The secretary for aging and disability services is authorized and
directed to establish, equip and maintain, in connection with and as a part
of the south central regional mental health hospital, suitable buildings for
an extension to the state security hospital for the purpose of holding in
custody, examining, treating and caring for such mentally ill persons as
may be committed or ordered to the state security hospital by courts of
criminal jurisdiction or inmates with mental illness who are transferred for
care or treatment to the state security hospital from a correctional
institution under the control of the secretary of corrections, or patients with
a mental illness, other than minors, who are transferred for care or
treatment to the state security hospital from any institution under the
jurisdiction of the secretary for aging and disability services. The secretary
for aging and disability services is hereby authorized and empowered to
supervise and manage the extension to the state security hospital. The
superintendent of the Larned state hospital shall act as the superintendent
of the extension to the state security hospital.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 21-5413 is hereby amended to read as follows: 21-
5413. (a) Battery is:
(1) Knowingly or recklessly causing bodily harm to another person;
or
(2) knowingly causing physical contact with another person when
done in a rude, insulting or angry manner.
(b) Aggravated battery is:
(1) (A) Knowingly causing great bodily harm to another person or
disfigurement of another person;
(B) knowingly causing bodily harm to another person with a deadly
weapon, or in any manner whereby great bodily harm, disfigurement or
death can be inflicted; or
(C) knowingly causing physical contact with another person when
done in a rude, insulting or angry manner with a deadly weapon, or in any
manner whereby great bodily harm, disfigurement or death can be
inflicted;
(2) (A) recklessly causing great bodily harm to another person or
disfigurement of another person;
(B) recklessly causing bodily harm to another person with a deadly
weapon, or in any manner whereby great bodily harm, disfigurement or
death can be inflicted; or
(3) (A) committing an act described in K.S.A. 8-1567, and
amendments thereto, when great bodily harm to another person or
disfigurement of another person results from such act; or
(B) committing an act described in K.S.A. 8-1567, and amendments
thereto, when bodily harm to another person results from such act under
circumstances whereby great bodily harm, disfigurement or death can

HB 2365—Am. by SC 3
result from such act; or
(4) committing an act described in K.S.A. 8-1567, and amendments
thereto, when great bodily harm to another person or disfigurement of
another person results from such act while:
(A) In violation of any restriction imposed on such person's driving
privileges pursuant to article 10 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated, and amendments thereto;
(B) such person's driving privileges are suspended or revoked
pursuant to article 10 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto; or
(C) such person has been deemed a habitual violator as defined in
K.S.A. 8-285, and amendments thereto, including at least one violation of
K.S.A. 8-1567, and amendments thereto, or violating an ordinance of any
city in this state, any resolution of any county in this state or any law of
another state, which ordinance, resolution or law declares to be unlawful
the acts prohibited by that statute.
(c) Battery against a law enforcement officer is:
(1) Battery as defined in subsection (a)(2) committed against a:
(A) Uniformed or properly identified university or campus police
officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's
duty;
(B) uniformed or properly identified state, county or city law
enforcement officer, other than a state correctional officer or employee, a
city or county correctional officer or employee or a juvenile detention
facility officer, or employee, while such officer is engaged in the
performance of such officer's duty;
(C) uniformed or properly identified federal law enforcement officer
while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(D) judge, while such judge is engaged in the performance of such
judge's duty;
(E) attorney, while such attorney is engaged in the performance of
such attorney's duty; or
(F) community corrections officer or court services officer, while
such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(2) battery as defined in subsection (a)(1) committed against a:
(A) Uniformed or properly identified university or campus police
officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's
duty;
(B) uniformed or properly identified state, county or city law
enforcement officer, other than a state correctional officer or employee, a
city or county correctional officer or employee or a juvenile detention
facility officer, or employee, while such officer is engaged in the
performance of such officer's duty;

HB 2365—Am. by SC 4
(C) uniformed or properly identified federal law enforcement officer
while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(D) judge, while such judge is engaged in the performance of such
judge's duty;
(E) attorney, while such attorney is engaged in the performance of
such attorney's duty; or
(F) community corrections officer or court services officer, while
such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty; or
(3) battery as defined in subsection (a) committed against a:
(A) State correctional officer or employee by a person in custody of
the secretary of corrections, while such officer or employee is engaged in
the performance of such officer's or employee's duty;
(B) state correctional officer or employee by a person confined in
such juvenile correctional facility, while such officer or employee is
engaged in the performance of such officer's or employee's duty;
(C) juvenile detention facility officer or employee by a person
confined in such juvenile detention facility, while such officer or employee
is engaged in the performance of such officer's or employee's duty; or
(D) city or county correctional officer or employee by a person
confined in a city holding facility or county jail facility, while such officer
or employee is engaged in the performance of such officer's or employee's
duty.
(d) Aggravated battery against a law enforcement officer is:
(1) Aggravated battery as defined in subsection (b)(1)(A) committed
against a:
(A) Uniformed or properly identified state, county or city law
enforcement officer while the officer is engaged in the performance of the
officer's duty;
(B) uniformed or properly identified university or campus police
officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's
duty;
(C) uniformed or properly identified federal law enforcement officer
while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(D) judge, while such judge is engaged in the performance of such
judge's duty;
(E) attorney, while such attorney is engaged in the performance of
such attorney's duty; or
(F) community corrections officer or court services officer, while
such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(2) aggravated battery as defined in subsection (b)(1)(B) or (b)(1)(C)
committed against a:
(A) Uniformed or properly identified state, county or city law
enforcement officer while the officer is engaged in the performance of the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 5
officer's duty;
(B) uniformed or properly identified university or campus police
officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's
duty;
(C) uniformed or properly identified federal law enforcement officer
while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty;
(D) judge, while such judge is engaged in the performance of such
judge's duty;
(E) attorney, while such attorney is engaged in the performance of
such attorney's duty; or
(F) community corrections officer or court services officer, while
such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty; or
(3) knowingly causing, with a motor vehicle, bodily harm to a:
(A) Uniformed or properly identified state, county or city law
enforcement officer while the officer is engaged in the performance of the
officer's duty;
(B) uniformed or properly identified university or campus police
officer while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's
duty; or
(C) uniformed or properly identified federal law enforcement officer
while such officer is engaged in the performance of such officer's duty.
(e) Battery against a school employee is a battery as defined in
subsection (a) committed against a school employee in or on any school
property or grounds upon which is located a building or structure used by a
unified school district or an accredited nonpublic school for student
instruction or attendance or extracurricular activities of pupils enrolled in
kindergarten or any of the grades one through 12 or at any regularly
scheduled school sponsored activity or event, while such employee is
engaged in the performance of such employee's duty.
(f) Battery against a mental health employee is a battery as defined in
subsection (a) committed against a mental health employee by a person in
the custody of the secretary for aging and disability services, while such
employee is engaged in the performance of such employee's duty.
(g) Battery against a healthcare provider is a battery as defined in
subsection (a) committed against a healthcare provider while such provider
is engaged in the performance of such provider's duty.
(h) (1) Battery is a class B person misdemeanor.
(2) Aggravated battery as defined in:
(A) Subsection (b)(1)(A) or (b)(4) is a severity level 4, person felony;
(B) subsection (b)(1)(B) or (b)(1)(C) is a severity level 7, person
felony;
(C) subsection (b)(2)(A) or (b)(3)(A) is a severity level 5, person
felony; and

HB 2365—Am. by SC 6
(D) subsection (b)(2)(B) or (b)(3)(B) is a severity level 8, person
felony.
(3) Battery against a law enforcement officer as defined in:
(A) Subsection (c)(1) is a class A person misdemeanor;
(B) subsection (c)(2) is a severity level 7, person felony; and
(C) subsection (c)(3) is a severity level 5, person felony.
(4) Aggravated battery against a law enforcement officer as defined
in:
(A) Subsection (d)(1) or (d)(3) is a severity level 3, person felony;
and
(B) subsection (d)(2) is a severity level 4, person felony.
(5) Battery against a school employee is a class A person
misdemeanor.
(6) Battery against a mental health employee is a severity level 7,
person felony.
(7) Battery against a healthcare provider is a class A person
misdemeanor.
(i) As used in this section:
(1) "Correctional institution" means any institution or facility under
the supervision and control of the secretary of corrections;
(2) "state correctional officer or employee" means any officer or
employee of the Kansas department of corrections or any independent
contractor, or any employee of such contractor, whose duties include
working at a correctional institution;
(3) "juvenile detention facility officer or employee" means any officer
or employee of a juvenile detention facility as defined in K.S.A. 38-2302,
and amendments thereto;
(4) "city or county correctional officer or employee" means any
correctional officer or employee of the city or county or any independent
contractor, or any employee of such contractor, whose duties include
working at a city holding facility or county jail facility;
(5) "school employee" means any employee of a unified school
district or an accredited nonpublic school for student instruction or
attendance or extracurricular activities of pupils enrolled in kindergarten or
any of the grades one through 12;
(6) "mental health employee" means:
(A) An employee of the Kansas department for aging and disability
services working at Larned state hospital, Osawatomie state hospital,
south central regional mental health hospital, Kansas neurological
institute and Parsons state hospital and training center and the treatment
staff as defined in K.S.A. 59-29a02, and amendments thereto; and
(B) contractors and employees of contractors under contract to
provide services to the Kansas department for aging and disability services

HB 2365—Am. by SC 7
working at any such institution or facility;
(7) "judge" means a duly elected or appointed justice of the supreme
court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of any district court of Kansas,
district magistrate judge or municipal court judge;
(8) "attorney" means a: (A) County attorney, assistant county
attorney, special assistant county attorney, district attorney, assistant
district attorney, special assistant district attorney, attorney general,
assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general; and (B)
public defender, assistant public defender, contract counsel for the state
board of indigents' defense services or an attorney who is appointed by the
court to perform services for an indigent person as provided by article 45
of chapter 22 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto;
(9) "community corrections officer" means an employee of a
community correctional services program responsible for supervision of
adults or juveniles as assigned by the court to community corrections
supervision and any other employee of a community correctional services
program that provides enhanced supervision of offenders such as house
arrest and surveillance programs;
(10) "court services officer" means an employee of the Kansas
judicial branch or local judicial district responsible for supervising,
monitoring or writing reports relating to adults or juveniles as assigned by
the court, or performing related duties as assigned by the court;
(11) "federal law enforcement officer" means a law enforcement
officer employed by the United States federal government who, as part of
such officer's duties, is permitted to make arrests and to be armed; and
(12) "healthcare provider" means an individual who is licensed,
registered, certified or otherwise authorized by the state of Kansas to
provide healthcare services in this state.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 39-1401 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 39-1401. As used in this act:
(a) "Resident" means:
(1) Any resident, as defined by K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments
thereto; or
(2) any individual kept, cared for, treated, boarded or otherwise
accommodated in a medical care facility; or
(3) any individual, kept, cared for, treated, boarded or otherwise
accommodated in a state psychiatric hospital or state institution for people
with intellectual disability.
(b) "Adult care home" means the same as defined in K.S.A. 39-923,
and amendments thereto.
(c) "In need of protective services" means that a resident is unable to
perform or obtain services which are necessary to maintain physical or
mental health, or both.

HB 2365—Am. by SC 8
(d) "Services which are necessary to maintain physical and mental
health" include, but are not limited to, the provision of medical care for
physical and mental health needs, the relocation of a resident to a facility
or institution able to offer such care, assistance in personal hygiene, food,
clothing, adequately heated and ventilated shelter, protection from health
and safety hazards, protection from maltreatment the result of which
includes, but is not limited to, malnutrition, deprivation of necessities or
physical punishment and transportation necessary to secure any of the
above stated needs, except that this term shall not include taking such
person into custody without consent, except as provided in this act.
(e) "Protective services" means services provided by the state or other
governmental agency or any private organizations or individuals which are
necessary to prevent abuse, neglect or exploitation. Such protective
services shall include, but not be limited to, evaluation of the need for
services, assistance in obtaining appropriate social services and assistance
in securing medical and legal services.
(f) "Abuse" means any act or failure to act performed intentionally or
recklessly that causes or is likely to cause harm to a resident, including:
(1) Infliction of physical or mental injury;
(2) any sexual act with a resident when the resident does not consent
or when the other person knows or should know that the resident is
incapable of resisting or declining consent to the sexual act due to mental
deficiency or disease or due to fear of retribution or hardship;
(3) unreasonable use of a physical restraint, isolation or medication
that harms or is likely to harm a resident;
(4) unreasonable use of a physical or chemical restraint, medication
or isolation as punishment, for convenience, in conflict with a physician's
orders or as a substitute for treatment, except where such conduct or
physical restraint is in furtherance of the health and safety of the resident
or another resident;
(5) a threat or menacing conduct directed toward a resident that
results or might reasonably be expected to result in fear or emotional or
mental distress to a resident;
(6) fiduciary abuse; or
(7) omission or deprivation by a caretaker or another person of goods
or services which are necessary to avoid physical or mental harm or
illness.
(g) "Neglect" means the failure or omission by one's self, caretaker or
another person with a duty to provide goods or services which are
reasonably necessary to ensure safety and well-being and to avoid physical
or mental harm or illness.
(h) "Caretaker" means a person or institution who has assumed the
responsibility, whether legally or not, for the care of the resident

HB 2365—Am. by SC 9
voluntarily, by contract or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(i) "Exploitation" means misappropriation of resident property or
intentionally taking unfair advantage of an adult's physical or financial
resources for another individual's personal or financial advantage by the
use of undue influence, coercion, harassment, duress, deception, false
representation or false pretense by a caretaker or another person.
(j) "Medical care facility" means a facility licensed under K.S.A. 65-
425 et seq., and amendments thereto, but shall not include, for purposes of
this act, a state psychiatric hospital or state institution for people with
intellectual disability, including Larned state hospital, Osawatomie state
hospital and Rainbow mental health facility, Kansas neurological institute
and, Parsons state hospital and training center south central regional
mental health hospital.
(k) "Fiduciary abuse" means a situation in which any person who is
the caretaker of, or who stands in a position of trust to, a resident, takes,
secretes, or appropriates the resident's money or property, to any use or
purpose not in the due and lawful execution of such person's trust.
(l) "State psychiatric hospital" means Larned state hospital,
Osawatomie state hospital and Rainbow mental health facility south
central regional mental health hospital.
(m) "State institution for people with intellectual disability" means
Kansas neurological institute and Parsons state hospital and training
center.
(n) "Report" means a description or accounting of an incident or
incidents of abuse, neglect or exploitation under this act and for the
purposes of this act shall not include any written assessment or findings.
(o) "Law enforcement" means the public office which is vested by
law with the duty to maintain public order, make arrests for crimes and
investigate criminal acts, whether that duty extends to all crimes or is
limited to specific crimes.
(p) "Legal representative" means an agent designated in a durable
power of attorney, power of attorney or durable power of attorney for
health care decisions or a court appointed guardian, conservator or trustee.
(q) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, escrow
company, finance company, saving institution, credit union or fiduciary
financial institution, chartered and supervised under state or federal law.
(r) "Governmental assistance provider" means an agency, or
employee of such agency, which is funded solely or in part to provide
assistance within the Kansas senior care act, K.S.A. 75-5926 et seq., and
amendments thereto, including medicaid and medicare.
No person shall be considered to be abused, neglected or exploited or
in need of protective services for the sole reason that such person relies
upon spiritual means through prayer alone for treatment in accordance

HB 2365—Am. by SC 10
with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious
denomination in lieu of medical treatment.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 39-1602 is hereby amended to read as follows: 39-
1602. As used in K.S.A. 39-1601 through 39-1612, and amendments
thereto:
(a) "Targeted population" means the population group designated by
rules and regulations of the secretary as most in need of mental health
services that are funded, in whole or in part, by state or other public
funding sources, and such group shall include adults with severe and
persistent mental illness, severely emotionally disturbed children and
adolescents and other individuals at risk of requiring institutional care.
(b) "Community based mental health services" includes, but is not
limited to, evaluation and diagnosis, case management services, mental
health inpatient and outpatient services, prescription and management of
psychotropic medication, prevention, education, consultation, treatment
and rehabilitation services, 24-hour emergency services, and any facilities
required therefor, that are provided within one or more local communities
in order to provide a continuum of care and support services to enable
mentally ill persons, including targeted population members, to function
outside of inpatient institutions to the extent of their capabilities.
Community based mental health services also include assistance in
securing employment services, housing services, medical and dental care
and other support services.
(c) "Mental health center" means any community mental health
center as defined in K.S.A. 39-2002, and amendments thereto.
(d) "Secretary" means the secretary for aging and disability services.
(e) "Department" means the Kansas department for aging and
disability services.
(f) "State psychiatric hospital" means Osawatomie state hospital,
Rainbow mental health facility or Larned state hospital or south central
regional mental health hospital.
(g) "Mental health reform phased program" means the program in
three phases for the implementation of mental health reform in Kansas as
follows:
(1) The first phase covers the counties in the Osawatomie state
hospital catchment area and is to commence on July 1, 1990, and is to be
completed by June 30, 1994;
(2) the second phase covers the counties in the Topeka state hospital
catchment area and is to commence on July 1, 1992, and is to be
completed by June 30, 1996; and
(3) the third phase covers the counties in the Larned state hospital
catchment area and is to commence on July 1, 1993, and is to be
completed by June 30, 1997.

HB 2365—Am. by SC 11
(h) "Screening" means the process performed by a participating
community mental health center, pursuant to a contract entered into with
the secretary under K.S.A. 39-1610, and amendments thereto, to determine
whether a person, under either voluntary or involuntary procedures, can be
evaluated or treated, or can be both evaluated and treated, in the
community or should be referred to the appropriate state psychiatric
hospital for such treatment or evaluation or for both treatment and
evaluation.
(i) "Osawatomie state hospital catchment area" means, except as
otherwise defined by rules and regulations of the secretary adopted
pursuant to K.S.A. 39-1613, and amendments thereto, the area composed
of the following counties: Allen, Anderson, Atchison, Bourbon, Brown,
Butler, Chase, Chautauqua, Cherokee, Clay, Cloud, Coffey, Cowley,
Crawford, Doniphan, Douglas, Elk, Franklin, Geary, Greenwood, Jackson,
Jefferson, Jewell, Johnson, Labette, Leavenworth, Linn, Lyon, Marshall,
Miami, Mitchell, Montgomery, Morris, Nemaha, Neosho, Osage,
Pottawatomie, Republic, Riley, Sedgwick, Shawnee, Wabaunsee,
Washington, Wilson, Woodson and Wyandotte.
(j) "Larned state hospital catchment area" means, except as otherwise
defined by rules and regulations of the secretary adopted pursuant to
K.S.A. 39-1613, and amendments thereto, the area composed of the
following counties: Barber, Barton, Cheyenne, Clark, Comanche, Decatur,
Dickinson, Edwards, Ellis, Ellsworth, Finney, Ford, Gove, Graham, Grant,
Gray, Greeley, Hamilton, Harper, Harvey, Haskell, Hodgeman, Kearny,
Kingman, Kiowa, Lane, Lincoln, Logan, Marion, McPherson, Meade,
Morton, Ness, Norton, Osborne, Ottawa, Pawnee, Phillips, Pratt, Rawlins,
Reno, Rice, Rooks, Rush, Russell, Saline, Scott, Seward, Sheridan,
Sherman, Smith, Stafford, Stanton, Stevens, Sumner, Thomas, Trego,
Wallace and Wichita.
(k) "Catchment area" means the Osawatomie state hospital catchment
area or the Larned state hospital catchment area or the south central
regional mental health hospital catchment area as defined in subsections
(i) and (m).
(l) "Participating mental health center" means a mental health center
that has entered into a contract with the secretary for aging and disability
services to provide screening, treatment and evaluation, court ordered
evaluation and other treatment services pursuant to the care and treatment
act for mentally ill persons, in keeping with the phased concept of the
mental health reform act.
(m) "South central regional mental hospital catchment area" means,
except as otherwise defined by rules and regulations of the secretary
adopted pursuant to K.S.A. 39-1613, and amendments thereto, the area
composed of the following counties: Sedgwick, Butler, Cowley, Harvey and

HB 2365—Am. by SC 12
Sumner.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 39-1613 is hereby amended to read as follows: 39-
1613. (a) The secretary for aging and disability services is hereby
authorized to adopt rules and regulations to define and redefine the
Osawatomie state hospital catchment area and Larned state hospital
catchment area areas as may be necessary in the opinion of the secretary
for aging and disability services to accommodate shifts in populations in
need of mental health services within available community mental health
facility and state institution hospital capacities and resources and in
accordance with the following:(1) Each such catchment area shall be
defined by contiguous counties that are designated by name;
(2) no county shall be included in more than one such catchment area;
(3) each county shall be included in the Osawatomie state hospital
catchment area or Larned state hospital catchment area; and
(4) No designated community mental health center shall be included
in more than one such catchment area. The designation of a county to a
particular catchment area shall not prevent the admission of persons to a
state hospital in another catchment area when there are insufficient
capacities and resources currently available in the designated state
hospital catchment area.
(b) Each rule and regulation adopted, amended or revived under this
section shall be published in its entirety in the Kansas register in the first
issue published after such adoption, amendment or revival.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 40-3401 is hereby amended to read as follows: 40-
3401. As used in this act:
(a) "Applicant" means any healthcare provider.
(b) "Basic coverage" means a policy of professional liability
insurance required to be maintained by each healthcare provider pursuant
to the provisions of K.S.A. 40-3402(a) or (b), and amendments thereto.
(c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of insurance.
(d) "Fiscal year" means the year commencing on the effective date of
this act and each year, commencing on the first day of July thereafter.
(e) "Fund" means the healthcare stabilization fund established
pursuant to K.S.A. 40-3403(a), and amendments thereto.
(f) (1) "Healthcare provider" means a:
(A) Person licensed to practice any branch of the healing arts by the
state board of healing arts, a;
(B) person who holds a temporary permit to practice any branch of
the healing arts issued by the state board of healing arts, a;
(C) person engaged in a postgraduate training program approved by
the state board of healing arts, a;
(D) medical care facility licensed by the state of Kansas, a;
(E) podiatrist licensed by the state board of healing arts, a;

HB 2365—Am. by SC 13
(F) health maintenance organization issued a certificate of authority
by the commissioner, an;
(G) optometrist licensed by the board of examiners in optometry, a;
(H) pharmacist licensed by the state board of pharmacy, a;
(I) licensed professional nurse who is authorized to practice as a
registered nurse anesthetist, a;
(J) licensed professional nurse who has been granted a temporary
authorization to practice nurse anesthesia under K.S.A. 65-1153, and
amendments thereto, a;
(K) professional corporation organized pursuant to the professional
corporation law of Kansas by persons who are authorized by such law to
form such a corporation and who are healthcare providers as defined by
this subsection, a;
(L) Kansas limited liability company organized for the purpose of
rendering professional services by its members who are healthcare
providers as defined by this subsection and who are legally authorized to
render the professional services for which the limited liability company is
organized, a;
(M) partnership of persons who are healthcare providers under this
subsection, a;
(N) Kansas not-for-profit corporation organized for the purpose of
rendering professional services by persons who are healthcare providers as
defined by this subsection, a;
(O) nonprofit corporation organized to administer the graduate
medical education programs of community hospitals or medical care
facilities affiliated with the university of Kansas school of medicine, a;
(P) dentist certified by the state board of healing arts to administer
anesthetics under K.S.A. 65-2899, and amendments thereto, a;
(Q) psychiatric hospital licensed prior to January 1, 1988, and
continuously thereafter under K.S.A. 2015 Supp. 75-3307b, prior to its
repeal, and K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto, or a mental
health center or mental health clinic licensed by the state of Kansas. On
and after January 1, 2015, "healthcare provider" also means a;
(R) physician assistant licensed by the state board of healing arts, a;
(S) licensed advanced practice registered nurse who is authorized by
the board of nursing to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in
the classification of a nurse-midwife, a;
(T) licensed advanced practice registered nurse who has been granted
a temporary authorization by the board of nursing to practice as an
advanced practice registered nurse in the classification of a nurse-midwife,
a;
(U) nursing facility licensed by the state of Kansas, an;
(V) assisted living facility licensed by the state of Kansas; or

HB 2365—Am. by SC 14
(W) a residential healthcare facility licensed by the state of Kansas.
(2) "Healthcare provider" does not include:
(1)(A) Any state institution for people with intellectual disability;
(2)(B) any state psychiatric hospital;
(3)(C) any person holding an exempt license issued by the state board
of healing arts or the board of nursing;
(4)(D) any person holding a visiting clinical professor license from
the state board of healing arts;
(5)(E) any person holding an inactive license issued by the state
board of healing arts;
(6)(F) any person holding a federally active license issued by the
state board of healing arts;
(7)(G) an advanced practice registered nurse who is authorized by the
board of nursing to practice as an advanced practice registered nurse in the
classification of nurse-midwife or nurse anesthetist and who practices
solely in the course of employment or active duty in the United States
government or any of its departments, bureaus or agencies or who
provides professional services as a charitable healthcare provider as
defined under K.S.A. 75-6102, and amendments thereto; or
(8)(H) a physician assistant licensed by the state board of healing arts
who practices solely in the course of employment or active duty in the
United States government or any of its departments, bureaus or agencies or
who provides professional services as a charitable healthcare provider as
defined under K.S.A. 75-6102, and amendments thereto.
(g) "Inactive healthcare provider" means a person or other entity who
purchased basic coverage or qualified as a self-insurer on or subsequent to
the effective date of this act but who, at the time a claim is made for
personal injury or death arising out of the rendering of or the failure to
render professional services by such healthcare provider, does not have
basic coverage or self-insurance in effect solely because such person is no
longer engaged in rendering professional service as a healthcare provider.
(h) "Insurer" means any corporation, association, reciprocal
exchange, inter-insurer and any other legal entity authorized to write
bodily injury or property damage liability insurance in this state, including
workers compensation and automobile liability insurance, pursuant to the
provisions of the acts contained in article 9, 11, 12 or 16 of chapter 40 of
the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto.
(i) "Plan" means the operating and administrative rules and
procedures developed by insurers and rating organizations or the
commissioner to make professional liability insurance available to
healthcare providers.
(j) "Professional liability insurance" means insurance providing
coverage for legal liability arising out of the performance of professional

HB 2365—Am. by SC 15
services rendered or that should have been rendered by a healthcare
provider.
(k) "Rating organization" means a corporation, an unincorporated
association, a partnership or an individual licensed pursuant to K.S.A. 40-
956, and amendments thereto, to make rates for professional liability
insurance.
(l) "Self-insurer" means a healthcare provider who qualifies as a self-
insurer pursuant to K.S.A. 40-3414, and amendments thereto.
(m) "Medical care facility" means the same when used in the
healthcare provider insurance availability act as defined in K.S.A. 65-425,
and amendments thereto, except that as used in the healthcare provider
insurance availability act such term, as it relates to insurance coverage
under the healthcare provider insurance availability act, also includes any
director, trustee, officer or administrator of a medical care facility.
(n) "Mental health center" means a mental health center licensed by
the state of Kansas under K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto,
except that as used in the healthcare provider insurance availability act
such term, as it relates to insurance coverage under the healthcare provider
insurance availability act, also includes any director, trustee, officer or
administrator of a mental health center.
(o) "Mental health clinic" means a mental health clinic licensed by
the state of Kansas under K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto,
except that, as used in the healthcare provider insurance availability act,
such term, as it relates to insurance coverage under the healthcare provider
insurance availability act, also includes any director, trustee, officer or
administrator of a mental health clinic.
(p) "State institution for people with intellectual disability" means
Winfield state hospital and training center, Parsons state hospital and
training center and the Kansas neurological institute.
(q) "State psychiatric hospital" means Larned state hospital,
Osawatomie state hospital and Rainbow mental health facility south
central regional mental health hospital.
(r) "Person engaged in residency training" means:
(1) A person engaged in a postgraduate training program approved by
the state board of healing arts who is employed by and is studying at the
university of Kansas medical center only when such person is engaged in
medical activities that do not include extracurricular, extra-institutional
medical service for which such person receives extra compensation and
that have not been approved by the dean of the school of medicine and the
executive vice-chancellor of the university of Kansas medical center.
Persons engaged in residency training shall be considered resident
healthcare providers for purposes of K.S.A. 40-3401 et seq., and
amendments thereto; and

HB 2365—Am. by SC 16
(2) a person engaged in a postgraduate training program approved by
the state board of healing arts who is employed by a nonprofit corporation
organized to administer the graduate medical education programs of
community hospitals or medical care facilities affiliated with the university
of Kansas school of medicine or who is employed by an affiliate of the
university of Kansas school of medicine as defined in K.S.A. 76-367, and
amendments thereto, only when such person is engaged in medical
activities that do not include extracurricular, extra-institutional medical
service for which such person receives extra compensation and that have
not been approved by the chief operating officer of the nonprofit
corporation or the chief operating officer of the affiliate and the executive
vice-chancellor of the university of Kansas medical center.
(s) "Full-time physician faculty employed by the university of Kansas
medical center" means a person licensed to practice medicine and surgery
who holds a full-time appointment at the university of Kansas medical
center when such person is providing healthcare. A person licensed to
practice medicine and surgery who holds a full-time appointment at the
university of Kansas medical center may also be employed part-time by
the United States department of veterans affairs if such employment is
approved by the executive vice-chancellor of the university of Kansas
medical center.
(t) "Sexual act" or "sexual activity" means that sexual conduct that
constitutes a criminal or tortious act under the laws of the state of Kansas.
(u) "Board" means the board of governors created by K.S.A. 40-3403,
and amendments thereto.
(v) "Board of directors" means the governing board created by K.S.A.
40-3413, and amendments thereto.
(w) "Locum tenens contract" means a temporary agreement not
exceeding 182 days per calendar year that employs a healthcare provider
to actively render professional services in this state.
(x) "Professional services" means patient care or other services
authorized under the act governing licensure of a healthcare provider.
(y) "Healthcare facility" means a nursing facility, an assisted living
facility or a residential healthcare facility as all such terms are defined in
K.S.A. 39-923, and amendments thereto.
(z) "Charitable healthcare provider" means the same as defined in
K.S.A. 75-6102, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 41-1126 is hereby amended to read as follows: 41-
1126. (a) In addition to other purposes for which expenditures may be
made from the other state fees fund of the Kansas department for aging
and disability services, moneys in the other state fees fund of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services shall be used by the secretary
for aging and disability services to provide financial assistance to

HB 2365—Am. by SC 17
community-based alcoholism and intoxication treatment programs for the
following purposes:
(1) Matching money under title XX of the federal social security act
to purchase treatment services from approved treatment facilities;
(2) providing start-up or expansion grants for halfway houses or
rehabilitation centers for alcoholics;
(3) purchasing services from approved treatment facilities for persons
who are needy but who are not eligible for assistance under either title
XIX or title XX of the federal social security act, and administrative costs
of the alcohol and drug abuse section which shall not exceed 10% of the
total moneys in the community alcoholism and intoxication programs
fund; and
(4) assisting to develop programs for prevention, education, early
identification and facility assistance and review team.
(b) No state alcohol treatment program at Osawatomie state hospital,
Rainbow mental health facility or Larned state hospital or south central
regional mental health hospital shall receive any moneys under the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) There is hereby established in the state treasury the community
alcoholism and intoxication programs fund.
(d) On or before the 10th day of each month, the director of accounts
and reports shall transfer from the state general fund to the community
alcoholism and intoxication programs fund interest earnings based on:
(1) The average daily balance of moneys in the community
alcoholism and intoxication programs fund for the preceding month; and
(2) the net earnings rate of the pooled money investment portfolio for
the preceding month.
(e) All expenditures from the community alcoholism and intoxication
programs fund shall be made in accordance with appropriations acts upon
warrants of the director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to
vouchers approved by the secretary for aging and disability services or the
secretary's designee.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-2006b is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-2006b. (a) At least annually, the secretary for aging and
disability services shall establish the basic maximum rate of charge for
treatment of patients in each state institution, except that such rates shall
not exceed projected hospital costs of the state institution, including the
allocated costs of services by other state agencies, as determined by
application of generally acceptable hospital accounting principles. In
determining these rates, the secretary shall compute the average daily
projected operating cost of treatment of all patients in each state institution
and shall set a basic maximum rate of charge for each and every patient in
each state institution and each such patient's responsible relatives at the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 18
average daily projected operating cost of each institution so computed.
When established pursuant to this section, each such rate shall be
published in the Kansas register by the secretary and thereafter, until a
subsequent rate is published as provided in this section, the rates last
published shall be the legal rate of charge. All courts in this state shall
recognize and take judicial notice of the procedure and the rates
established under this section.
(b) In lieu of the procedure for computing the basic maximum rate of
charge established under subsection (a), the secretary for aging and
disability services may authorize any state institution to compute an
individual patient charge on the basis of rates for services based on cost
incurred by such state institution as determined by application of generally
acceptable hospital accounting principles.
(c) As used in this section, "state institution" means the Osawatomie
state hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Larned state hospital,
including the state security hospital, Parsons state hospital and training
center, south central regional mental health hospital, including the
extension state security hospital and the Kansas neurological institute.
Sec. 9. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-2946 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-2946. When used in the care and treatment act for mentally ill
persons:
(a) "Discharge" means the final and complete release from treatment,
by either the head of a treatment facility acting pursuant to K.S.A. 59-
2950, and amendments thereto, or by an order of a court issued pursuant to
K.S.A. 59-2973, and amendments thereto.
(b) "Head of a treatment facility" means the administrative director of
a treatment facility or such person's designee.
(c) "Law enforcement officer" means the same as defined in K.S.A.
22-2202, and amendments thereto.
(d) (1) "Mental health center" means any community mental health
center as defined in K.S.A. 39-2002, and amendments thereto, or a mental
health clinic organized as a not-for-profit or a for-profit corporation
pursuant to K.S.A. 17-1701 through 17-1775, and amendments thereto, or
K.S.A. 17-6001 through 17-6010, and amendments thereto, and licensed in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
(2) "Participating mental health center" means a mental health center
that has entered into a contract with the secretary for aging and disability
services pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 39-1601 through 39-1612,
and amendments thereto.
(e) "Mentally ill person" means any person who is suffering from a
mental disorder that is manifested by a clinically significant behavioral or
psychological syndrome or pattern and associated with either a painful

HB 2365—Am. by SC 19
symptom or an impairment in one or more important areas of functioning,
and involving substantial behavioral, psychological or biological
dysfunction, to the extent that the person is in need of treatment.
(f) (1) "Mentally ill person subject to involuntary commitment for
care and treatment" means a mentally ill person, as defined in subsection
(e), who also lacks capacity to make an informed decision concerning
treatment, is likely to cause harm to self or others, and whose diagnosis is
not solely one of the following mental disorders: Alcohol or chemical
substance abuse; antisocial personality disorder; intellectual disability;
organic personality syndrome; or an organic mental disorder.
(2) "Lacks capacity to make an informed decision concerning
treatment" means that the person, by reason of the person's mental
disorder, is unable, despite conscientious efforts at explanation, to
understand basically the nature and effects of hospitalization or treatment
or is unable to engage in a rational decision-making process regarding
hospitalization or treatment, as evidenced by an inability to weigh the
possible risks and benefits.
(3) "Likely to cause harm to self or others" means that the person, by
reason of the person's mental disorder: (A) Is likely, in the reasonably
foreseeable future, to cause substantial physical injury or physical abuse to
self or others or substantial damage to another's property, as evidenced by
behavior threatening, attempting or causing such injury, abuse or damage;
except that if the harm threatened, attempted or caused is only harm to the
property of another, the harm must be of such a value and extent that the
state's interest in protecting the property from such harm outweighs the
person's interest in personal liberty; or (B) is substantially unable, except
for reason of indigency, to provide for any of the person's basic needs,
such as food, clothing, shelter, health or safety, causing a substantial
deterioration of the person's ability to function on the person's own.
No person who is being treated by prayer in the practice of the religion
of any church that teaches reliance on spiritual means alone through prayer
for healing shall be determined to be a mentally ill person subject to
involuntary commitment for care and treatment under this act unless
substantial evidence is produced upon which the district court finds that
the proposed patient is likely in the reasonably foreseeable future to cause
substantial physical injury or physical abuse to self or others or substantial
damage to another's property, as evidenced by behavior threatening,
attempting or causing such injury, abuse or damage; except that if the harm
threatened, attempted or caused is only harm to the property of another, the
harm must be of such a value and extent that the state's interest in
protecting the property from such harm outweighs the person's interest in
personal liberty.
(g) "Patient" means a person who is a voluntary patient, a proposed

HB 2365—Am. by SC 20
patient or an involuntary patient.
(1) "Voluntary patient" means a person who is receiving treatment at
a treatment facility pursuant to K.S.A. 59-2949, and amendments thereto.
(2) "Proposed patient" means a person for whom a petition pursuant
to K.S.A. 59-2952 or 59-2957, and amendments thereto, has been filed.
(3) "Involuntary patient" means a person who is receiving treatment
under order of a court or a person admitted and detained by a treatment
facility pursuant to an application filed pursuant to K.S.A. 59-2954(b) or
(c), and amendments thereto.
(h) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine and
surgery as provided for in the Kansas healing arts act or a person who is
employed by a state psychiatric hospital or by an agency of the United
States and who is authorized by law to practice medicine and surgery
within that hospital or agency.
(i) "Psychologist" means a licensed psychologist, as defined by
K.S.A. 74-5302, and amendments thereto.
(j) "Qualified mental health professional" means a physician or
psychologist who is employed by a participating mental health center or
who is providing services as a physician or psychologist under a contract
with a participating mental health center, a licensed master's level
psychologist, a licensed clinical psychotherapist, a licensed marriage and
family therapist, a licensed clinical marriage and family therapist, a
licensed professional counselor, a licensed clinical professional counselor,
a licensed specialist social worker or a licensed master social worker or a
registered nurse who has a specialty in psychiatric nursing, who is
employed by a participating mental health center and who is acting under
the direction of a physician or psychologist who is employed by, or under
contract with, a participating mental health center.
(1) "Direction" means monitoring and oversight including regular,
periodic evaluation of services.
(2) "Licensed master social worker" means a person licensed as a
master social worker by the behavioral sciences regulatory board under
K.S.A. 65-6301 through 65-6318, and amendments thereto.
(3) "Licensed specialist social worker" means a person licensed in a
social work practice specialty by the behavioral sciences regulatory board
under K.S.A. 65-6301 through 65-6318, and amendments thereto.
(4) "Licensed master's level psychologist" means a person licensed as
a licensed master's level psychologist by the behavioral sciences regulatory
board under K.S.A. 74-5361 through 74-5373, and amendments thereto.
(5) "Registered nurse" means a person licensed as a registered
professional nurse by the board of nursing under K.S.A. 65-1113 through
65-1164, and amendments thereto.
(k) "Secretary" means the secretary for aging and disability services.

HB 2365—Am. by SC 21
(l) "State psychiatric hospital" means Larned state hospital,
Osawatomie state hospital or Rainbow mental health facility south central
regional mental health hospital.
(m) "Treatment" means any service intended to promote the mental
health of the patient and rendered by a qualified professional, licensed or
certified by the state to provide such service as an independent practitioner
or under the supervision of such practitioner.
(n) "Treatment facility" means any mental health center or clinic,
psychiatric unit of a medical care facility, state psychiatric hospital,
psychologist, physician or other institution or person authorized or
licensed by law to provide either inpatient or outpatient treatment to any
patient.
(o) The terms defined in K.S.A. 59-3051, and amendments thereto,
shall have the meanings provided by that section.
Sec. 10. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-29b46 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-29b46. When used in the care and treatment act for persons
with an alcohol or substance abuse problem:
(a) "Discharge" means the final and complete release from treatment,
by either the head of a treatment facility acting pursuant to K.S.A. 59-
29b50, and amendments thereto, or by an order of a court issued pursuant
to K.S.A. 59-29b73, and amendments thereto.
(b) "Head of a treatment facility" means the administrative director of
a treatment facility or such person's designee.
(c) "Law enforcement officer" means the same as defined in K.S.A.
22-2202, and amendments thereto.
(d) "Licensed addiction counselor" means a person who engages in
the practice of addiction counseling limited to substance use disorders and
who is licensed by the behavioral sciences regulatory board. Such person
shall engage in the practice of addiction counseling in a state-licensed or
certified alcohol and other drug treatment program or while completing a
Kansas domestic violence offender assessment for participants in a
certified batterer intervention program pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7d01 through
75-7d13, and amendments thereto, unless otherwise exempt from licensure
under subsection (n).
(e) "Licensed clinical addiction counselor" means a person who
engages in the independent practice of addiction counseling and diagnosis
and treatment of substance use disorders specified in the edition of the
American psychiatric association's diagnostic and statistical manual of
mental disorders (DSM) designated by the board by rules and regulations
and is licensed by the behavioral sciences regulatory board.
(f) "Licensed master's addiction counselor" means a person who
engages in the practice of addiction counseling limited to substance use
disorders and who is licensed under this act. Such person may diagnose

HB 2365—Am. by SC 22
substance use disorders only under the direction of a licensed clinical
addiction counselor, a licensed psychologist, a person licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or a person licensed to provide mental health
services as an independent practitioner and whose licensure allows for the
diagnosis and treatment of substance abuse disorders or mental disorders.
(g) "Other facility for care or treatment" means any mental health
clinic, medical care facility, nursing home, the detox units at either
Osawatomie state hospital or Larned state hospital any state hospital, any
physician or any other institution or individual authorized or licensed by
law to give care or treatment to any person.
(h) "Patient" means a person who is a voluntary patient, a proposed
patient or an involuntary patient.
(1) "Voluntary patient" means a person who is receiving treatment at
a treatment facility pursuant to K.S.A. 59-29b49, and amendments thereto.
(2) "Proposed patient" means a person for whom a petition pursuant
to K.S.A. 59-29b52 or 59-29b57, and amendments thereto, has been filed.
(3) "Involuntary patient" means a person who is receiving treatment
under order of a court or a person admitted and detained by a treatment
facility pursuant to an application filed pursuant to K.S.A. 59-29b54(b) or
(c), and amendments thereto.
(i) "Person with an alcohol or substance abuse problem" means a
person who: (1) Lacks self-control as to the use of alcoholic beverages or
any substance as defined in subsection (m); or
(2) uses alcoholic beverages or any substance to the extent that the
person's health may be substantially impaired or endangered without
treatment.
(j) (1) "Person with an alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to
involuntary commitment for care and treatment" means a person with an
alcohol or substance abuse problem who also is incapacitated by alcohol or
any substance and is likely to cause harm to self or others.
(2) "Incapacitated by alcohol or any substance" means that the
person, as the result of the use of alcohol or any substance, has impaired
judgment resulting in the person:
(A) Being incapable of realizing and making a rational decision with
respect to the need for treatment; or
(B) lacking sufficient understanding or capability to make or
communicate responsible decisions concerning either the person's well-
being or estate.
(3) "Likely to cause harm to self or others" means that the person, by
reason of the person's use of alcohol or any substance: (A) Is likely, in the
reasonably foreseeable future, to cause substantial physical injury or
physical abuse to self or others or substantial damage to another's property,
as evidenced by behavior threatening, attempting or causing such injury,

HB 2365—Am. by SC 23
abuse or damage; except that if the harm threatened, attempted or caused is
only harm to the property of another, the harm must be of such a value and
extent that the state's interest in protecting the property from such harm
outweighs the person's interest in personal liberty; or
(B) is substantially unable, except for reason of indigency, to provide
for any of the person's basic needs, such as food, clothing, shelter, health
or safety, causing a substantial deterioration of the person's ability to
function on the person's own.
(k) "Physician" means a person licensed to practice medicine and
surgery as provided for in the Kansas healing arts act or a person who is
employed by a state psychiatric hospital or by an agency of the United
States and who is authorized by law to practice medicine and surgery
within that hospital or agency.
(l) "Psychologist" means a licensed psychologist, as defined by
K.S.A. 74-5302, and amendments thereto.
(m) "Substance" means: (1) The same as the term "controlled
substance" as defined in K.S.A. 21-5701, and amendments thereto; or
(2) fluorocarbons, toluene or volatile hydrocarbon solvents.
(n) "Treatment" means the broad range of emergency, outpatient,
intermediate and inpatient services and care, including diagnostic
evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological and social service care,
vocational rehabilitation and career counseling, which may be extended to
persons with an alcohol or substance abuse problem.
(o) (1) "Treatment facility" means a treatment program, public or
private treatment facility, or any facility of the United States government
available to treat a person for an alcohol or other substance abuse problem,
but such term does not include a licensed medical care facility, a licensed
adult care home, a facility licensed under K.S.A. 2015 Supp. 75-3307b,
prior to its repeal or under K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments
thereto, a community-based alcohol and drug safety action program
certified under K.S.A. 8-1008, and amendments thereto, and performing
only those functions for which the program is certified to perform under
K.S.A. 8-1008, and amendments thereto, or a professional licensed by the
behavioral sciences regulatory board to diagnose and treat mental
disorders at the independent level or a physician, who may treat in the
usual course of the behavioral sciences regulatory board licensee's or
physician's professional practice individuals incapacitated by alcohol or
other substances, but who are not primarily engaged in the usual course of
the individual's professional practice in treating such individuals, or any
state institution, even if detoxification services may have been obtained at
such institution.
(2) "Private treatment facility" means a private agency providing
facilities for the care and treatment or lodging of persons with either an

HB 2365—Am. by SC 24
alcohol or other substance abuse problem and meeting the standards
prescribed in either K.S.A. 65-4013 or 65-4603, and amendments thereto,
and licensed under either K.S.A. 65-4014 or 65-4607, and amendments
thereto.
(3) "Public treatment facility" means a treatment facility owned and
operated by any political subdivision of the state of Kansas and licensed
under either K.S.A. 65-4014 or 65-4603, and amendments thereto, as an
appropriate place for the care and treatment or lodging of persons with an
alcohol or other substance abuse problem.
(p) The terms defined in K.S.A. 59-3051, and amendments thereto,
shall have the meanings provided by that section.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-29b54 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-29b54. (a) A treatment facility may admit and detain any
person for emergency observation and treatment upon an ex parte
emergency custody order issued by a district court pursuant to K.S.A. 59-
29b58, and amendments thereto.
(b) A treatment facility or the detox unit at Osawatomie state hospital
or at Larned state hospital any state hospital may admit and detain any
person presented for emergency observation and treatment upon written
application of a law enforcement officer having custody of that person
pursuant to K.S.A. 59-29b53, and amendments thereto. The application
shall state:
(1) The name and address of the person sought to be admitted, if
known;
(2) the name and address of the person's spouse or nearest relative, if
known;
(3) the officer's belief that the person is or may be a person with an
alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment for
care and treatment and is likely to cause harm to self or others if not
immediately detained;
(4) the factual circumstances in support of that belief and the factual
circumstances under which the person was taken into custody including
any known pending criminal charges; and
(5) the fact that the law enforcement officer will file the petition
provided for in K.S.A. 59-29b57, and amendments thereto, by the close of
business of the first day thereafter that the district court is open for the
transaction of business, or that the officer has been informed by a parent,
legal guardian or other person, whose name shall be stated in the
application will file the petition provided for in K.S.A. 59-29b57, and
amendments thereto, within that time.
(c) A treatment facility may admit and detain any person presented
for emergency observation and treatment upon the written application of
any individual. The application shall state:

HB 2365—Am. by SC 25
(1) The name and address of the person sought to be admitted, if
known;
(2) the name and address of the person's spouse or nearest relative, if
known;
(3) the applicant's belief that the person may be a person with an
alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment
and is likely to cause harm to self or others if not immediately detained;
(4) the factual circumstances in support of that belief;
(5) any pending criminal charges, if known;
(6) the fact that the applicant will file the petition provided for in
K.S.A. 59-29b57, and amendments thereto, by the close of business of the
first day thereafter that the district court is open for the transaction of
business; and
(7) the application shall also be accompanied by a statement in
writing of a physician, psychologist or licensed addiction counselor
finding that the person is likely to be a person with an alcohol or substance
abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment for care and treatment
under this act.
(d) Any treatment facility or personnel thereof, who in good faith
renders treatment in accordance with law to any person admitted pursuant
to subsection (b) or (c), shall not be liable in a civil or criminal action
based upon a claim that the treatment was rendered without legal consent.
Sec. 12. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-29b57 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-29b57. (a) A verified petition to determine whether or not a
person is a person with an alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to
involuntary commitment for care and treatment under this act may be filed
in the district court of the county wherein that person resides or wherein
such person may be found.
(b) The petition shall state:
(1) The petitioner's belief that the named person is a person with an
alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment
and the facts upon which this belief is based;
(2) to the extent known, the name, age, present whereabouts and
permanent address of the person named as possibly a person with an
alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment;
and if not known, any information the petitioner might have about this
person and where the person resides;
(3) to the extent known, the name and address of the person's spouse
or nearest relative or relatives, or legal guardian, or if not known, any
information the petitioner might have about a spouse, relative or relatives
or legal guardian and where they might be found;
(4) to the extent known, the name and address of the person's legal
counsel, or if not known, any information the petitioner might have about

HB 2365—Am. by SC 26
this person's legal counsel;
(5) to the extent known, whether or not this person is able to pay for
medical services, or if not known, any information the petitioner might
have about the person's financial circumstances or indigency;
(6) to the extent known, the name and address of any person who has
custody of the person, and any known pending criminal charge or charges
or of any arrest warrant or warrants outstanding or, if there are none, that
fact or if not known, any information the petitioner might have about any
current criminal justice system involvement with the person;
(7) the name or names and address or addresses of any witness or
witnesses the petitioner believes has knowledge of facts relevant to the
issue being brought before the court; and
(8) the name and address of the treatment facility to which the
petitioner recommends that the proposed patient be sent for treatment if
the proposed patient is found to be a person with an alcohol or substance
abuse problem subject to involuntary commitment for care and treatment
under this act, or if the petitioner is not able to recommend a treatment
facility to the court, then that fact and that the secretary for aging and
disability services has been notified and requested to determine which
treatment facility the proposed patient should be sent to.
(c) The petition shall be accompanied by:
(1) A signed certificate from a physician, psychologist or state
certified alcohol and substance abuse counselor stating that such
professional has personally examined the person and any available records
and has found that the person, in such professional's opinion, is likely to be
a person with an alcohol or substance abuse problem subject to involuntary
commitment for care and treatment under this act, unless the court allows
the petition to be accompanied by a verified statement by the petitioner
that the petitioner had attempted to have the person seen by a physician,
psychologist or state certified alcohol and substance abuse counselor, but
that the person failed to cooperate to such an extent that the examination
was impossible to conduct;
(2) a statement of consent to the admission of the proposed patient to
the treatment facility named by the petitioner pursuant to subsection (b)(8)
signed by the head of that treatment facility or other documentation which
shows the willingness of the treatment facility to admitting the proposed
patient for care and treatment; and
(3) if applicable, a copy of any notice given pursuant to K.S.A. 59-
29b51, and amendments thereto, in which the named person has sought
discharge from a treatment facility into which they had previously entered
voluntarily, or a statement from the treating physician or psychologist that
the person was admitted as a voluntary patient but now lacks capacity to
make an informed decision concerning treatment and is refusing

HB 2365—Am. by SC 27
reasonable treatment efforts, and including a description of the treatment
efforts being refused.
(d) The petition may include a request that an ex parte emergency
custody order be issued pursuant to K.S.A. 59-29b58, and amendments
thereto. If such request is made the petition shall also include:
(1) A brief statement explaining why the person should be
immediately detained or continue to be detained;
(2) the place where the petitioner requests that the person be detained
or continue to be detained; and
(3) if applicable, because detention is requested in a facility other
than the detox unit at either Osawatomie state hospital or at Larned a state
hospital, a statement that the facility is willing to accept and detain such
person.
(e) The petition may include a request that a temporary custody order
be issued pursuant to K.S.A. 59-29b59, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 13. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-3077 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-3077. (a) At any time after the filing of the petition provided
for in K.S.A. 59-3058, 59-3059, 59-3060 or 59-3061, and amendments
thereto, any person may file in addition to that original petition, or as a
part thereof, or at any time after the appointment of a temporary guardian
as provided for in K.S.A. 59-3073, and amendments thereto, or a guardian
as provided for in K.S.A. 59-3067, and amendments thereto, the temporary
guardian or guardian may file a verified petition requesting that the court
grant authority to the temporary guardian or guardian to admit the
proposed ward or ward to a treatment facility, as defined in subsection (h),
and to consent to the care and treatment of the proposed ward or ward
therein. The petition shall include:
(1) The petitioner's name and address, and if the petitioner is the
proposed ward's or ward's court appointed temporary guardian or guardian,
that fact;
(2) the proposed ward's or ward's name, age, date of birth, address of
permanent residence and present address or whereabouts, if different from
the proposed ward's or ward's permanent residence;
(3) the name and address of the proposed ward's or ward's court
appointed temporary guardian or guardian, if different from the petitioner;
(4) the factual basis upon which the petitioner alleges the need for the
proposed ward or ward to be admitted to and treated at a treatment facility,
or for the proposed ward or ward to continue to be treated at the treatment
facility to which the proposed ward or ward has already been admitted, or
for the guardian to have continuing authority to admit the ward for care
and treatment at a treatment facility pursuant to K.S.A. 59-2949(b)(3) or
K.S.A. 59-29b49(b)(3), and amendments thereto;
(5) the names and addresses of witnesses by whom the truth of this

HB 2365—Am. by SC 28
petition may be proved; and
(6) a request that the court find that the proposed ward or ward is in
need of being admitted to and treated at a treatment facility, and that the
court grant to the temporary guardian or guardian the authority to admit
the proposed ward or ward to a treatment facility and to consent to the care
and treatment of the proposed ward or ward therein.
(b) The petition may be accompanied by a report of an examination
and evaluation of the proposed ward or ward conducted by an
appropriately qualified professional that shows that the criteria set out in
K.S.A. 39-1803, 59-2946(e), 59-29b46(i) or 76-12b03, and amendments
thereto, are met.
(c) Upon the filing of such a petition, the court shall issue the
following:
(1) An order fixing the date, time and place of a hearing on the
petition. Such hearing, in the court's discretion, may be conducted in a
courtroom, a treatment facility or at some other suitable place. The time
fixed in the order shall in no event be earlier than seven days or later than
21 days after the date of the filing of the petition. The court may
consolidate this hearing with the trial upon the original petition filed
pursuant to K.S.A. 59-3058, 59-3059, 59-3060 or 59-3061, and
amendments thereto, or with the trial provided for in the care and
treatment act for mentally ill persons or the care and treatment act for
persons with an alcohol or substance abuse problem, if the petition also
incorporates the allegations required by, and is filed in compliance with,
the provisions of either of those acts.
(2) An order requiring that the proposed ward or ward appear at the
time and place of the hearing on the petition unless the court makes a
finding prior to the hearing that the presence of the proposed ward or ward
will be injurious to the person's health or welfare, that the proposed ward's
or ward's impairment is such that the person could not meaningfully
participate in the proceedings or that the proposed ward or ward has filed
with the court a written waiver of such ward's right to appear in person. In
any such case, the court shall enter in the record of the proceedings the
facts upon which the court has found that the presence of the proposed
ward or ward at the hearing should be excused. Notwithstanding the
foregoing provisions of this subsection, if the proposed ward or ward files
with the court at least one day prior to the date of the hearing a written
notice stating the person's desire to be present at the hearing, the court
shall order that the person must be present at the hearing.
(3) An order appointing an attorney to represent the proposed ward or
ward. The court shall give preference, in the appointment of this attorney,
to any attorney who has represented the proposed ward or ward in other
matters, if the court has knowledge of that prior representation. The

HB 2365—Am. by SC 29
proposed ward, or the ward with the consent of the ward's conservator, if
one has been appointed, shall have the right to engage an attorney of the
proposed ward's or ward's choice and, in such case, the attorney appointed
by the court shall be relieved of all duties by the court. Any appointment
made by the court shall terminate upon a final determination of the petition
and any appeal therefrom, unless the court continues the appointment by
further order.
(4) An order fixing the date, time and a place that is in the best
interest of the proposed ward or ward at which the proposed ward or ward
shall have the opportunity to consult with such ward's attorney. This
consultation shall be scheduled to occur prior to the time at which the
examination and evaluation ordered pursuant to subsection (d)(1), if
ordered, is scheduled to occur.
(5) A notice similar to that provided for in K.S.A. 59-3066, and
amendments thereto.
(d) Upon the filing of such a petition, the court may issue the
following:
(1) An order for a psychological or other examination and evaluation
of the proposed ward or ward, as may be specified by the court. The court
may order the proposed ward or ward to submit to such an examination
and evaluation to be conducted through a general hospital, psychiatric
hospital, community mental health center or community developmental
disability organization or by a private physician, psychiatrist, psychologist
or other person appointed by the court who is qualified to examine and
evaluate the proposed ward or ward. The costs of this examination and
evaluation shall be assessed as provided for in K.S.A. 59-3094, and
amendments thereto.
(2) If the petition is accompanied by a report of an examination and
evaluation of the proposed ward or ward as provided for in subsection (b),
an order granting temporary authority to the temporary guardian or
guardian to admit the proposed ward or ward to a treatment facility and to
consent to the care and treatment of the proposed ward or ward therein.
Any such order shall expire immediately after the hearing upon the
petition, or as the court may otherwise specify, or upon the discharge of
the proposed ward or ward by the head of the treatment facility, if the
proposed ward or ward is discharged prior to the time at which the order
would otherwise expire.
(3) For good cause shown, an order of continuance of the hearing.
(4) For good cause shown, an order of advancement of the hearing.
(5) For good cause shown, an order changing the place of the hearing.
(e) The hearing on the petition shall be held at the time and place
specified in the court's order issued pursuant to subsection (c), unless an
order of advancement, continuance or a change of place of the hearing has

HB 2365—Am. by SC 30
been issued pursuant to subsection (d). The petitioner and the proposed
ward or ward shall each be afforded an opportunity to appear at the
hearing, to testify and to present and cross-examine witnesses. If the
hearing has been consolidated with a trial being held pursuant to either the
care and treatment act for mentally ill persons or the care and treatment act
for persons with an alcohol or substance abuse problem, persons not
necessary for the conduct of the proceedings may be excluded as provided
for in those acts. The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner
as may be consistent with orderly procedure. The court shall have the
authority to receive all relevant and material evidence which may be
offered, including the testimony or written report, findings or
recommendations of any professional or other person who has examined
or evaluated the proposed ward or ward pursuant to any order issued by
the court pursuant to subsection (d). Such evidence shall not be privileged
for the purpose of this hearing.
(f) Upon completion of the hearing, if the court finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the criteria set out in K.S.A. 39-1803, 59-
2946(e), 59-29b46(i) or 76-12b03, and amendments thereto, are met, and
after a careful consideration of reasonable alternatives to admission of the
proposed ward or ward to a treatment facility, the court may enter an order
granting such authority to the temporary guardian or guardian as is
appropriate, including continuing authority to the guardian to readmit the
ward to an appropriate treatment facility as may later become necessary.
Any such grant of continuing authority shall expire two years after the date
of final discharge of the ward from such a treatment facility if the ward has
not had to be readmitted to a treatment facility during that two-year period
of time. Thereafter, any such grant of continuing authority may be renewed
only after the filing of another petition seeking authority in compliance
with the provision of this section.
(g) Nothing herein shall be construed so as to prohibit the head of a
treatment facility from admitting a proposed ward or ward to that facility
as a voluntary patient if the head of the treatment facility is satisfied that
the proposed ward or ward at that time has the capacity to understand such
ward's illness and need for treatment, and to consent to such ward's
admission and treatment. Upon any such admission, the head of the
treatment facility shall give notice to the temporary guardian or guardian
as soon as possible of the ward's admission, and shall provide to the
temporary guardian or guardian copies of any consents the proposed ward
or ward has given. Thereafter, the temporary guardian or guardian shall
timely either seek to obtain proper authority pursuant to this section to
admit the proposed ward or ward to a treatment facility and to consent to
further care and treatment, or shall otherwise assume responsibility for the
care of the proposed ward or ward, consistent with the authority of the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 31
temporary guardian or guardian, and may arrange for the discharge from
the facility of the proposed ward or ward, unless the head of the treatment
facility shall file a petition requesting the involuntary commitment of the
proposed ward or ward to that or some other facility.
(h) As used herein, "treatment facility" means the Kansas
neurological institute, Larned state hospital, Osawatomie state hospital,
south central regional mental health hospital, Parsons state hospital and
training center, the Rainbow mental health facility, any intermediate care
facility for people with intellectual disability, any psychiatric hospital
licensed pursuant to K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto, and
any other facility for mentally ill persons or people with intellectual or
developmental disabilities licensed pursuant to K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and
amendments thereto, if the proposed ward or ward is to be admitted as an
inpatient or resident of that facility.
Sec. 14. K.S.A. 65-4921 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
4921. As used in K.S.A. 65-4921 through 65-4930, and amendments
thereto:
(a) "Appropriate licensing agency" means the agency that issued the
license to the individual or health care healthcare provider who is the
subject of a report under this act.
(b) "Department" means the department of health and environment.
(c) "Health careHealthcare provider" means:
(1) Those persons and entities defined as a health care healthcare
provider under K.S.A. 40-3401, and amendments thereto; and
(2) a dentist licensed by the Kansas dental board, a dental hygienist
licensed by the Kansas dental board, a professional nurse licensed by the
board of nursing, a practical nurse licensed by the board of nursing, a
mental health technician licensed by the board of nursing, a physical
therapist licensed by the state board of healing arts, a physical therapist
assistant certified by the state board of healing arts, an occupational
therapist licensed by the state board of healing arts, an occupational
therapy assistant licensed by the state board of healing arts and a
respiratory therapist licensed by the state board of healing arts.
(d) "License," "licensee" and "licensing" include comparable terms
that relate to regulation similar to licensure, such as registration.
(e) "Medical care facility" means:
(1) A medical care facility licensed under K.S.A. 65-425 et seq., and
amendments thereto;
(2) a private psychiatric hospital licensed under K.S.A. 39-2001 et
seq., and amendments thereto; and
(3) state psychiatric hospitals and state institutions for people with
intellectual disability, as follows: Larned state hospital, Osawatomie state
hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Kansas neurological institute,

HB 2365—Am. by SC 32
south central regional mental health hospital and Parsons state hospital
and training center.
(f) "Reportable incident" means an act by a health care healthcare
provider that:
(1) Is or may be below the applicable standard of care and has a
reasonable probability of causing injury to a patient; or
(2) may be grounds for disciplinary action by the appropriate
licensing agency.
(g) "Risk manager" means the individual designated by a medical
care facility to administer its internal risk management program and to
receive reports of reportable incidents within the facility.
(h) "Secretary" means the secretary of health and environment.
Sec. 15. K.S.A. 65-5601 is hereby amended to read as follows: 65-
5601. As used in K.S.A. 65-5601 through 65-5605, and amendments
thereto:
(a) "Patient" means a person who consults or is examined or
interviewed by treatment personnel.
(b) "Treatment personnel" means any employee of a treatment facility
who receives a confidential communication from a patient while engaged
in the diagnosis or treatment of a mental, alcoholic, drug dependency or
emotional condition, if such communication was not intended to be
disclosed to third persons.
(c) "Ancillary personnel" means any employee of a treatment facility
who is not included in the definition of treatment personnel.
(d) "Treatment facility" means a community mental health center,
community service provider, psychiatric hospital and state institution for
people with intellectual disability.
(e) "Head of the treatment facility" means the administrative director
of a treatment facility or the designee of the administrative director.
(f) "Community mental health center" means the same as defined in
K.S.A. 39-2002, and amendments thereto.
(g) "Psychiatric hospital" means Larned state hospital, Osawatomie
state hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Topeka state hospital south
central regional mental health hospital and hospitals licensed under
K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto.
(h) "State institution for people with intellectual disability" means
Winfield state hospital and training center, Parsons state hospital and
training center and the Kansas neurological institute.
(i) "Community service provider" means: (1) A community facility
for people with intellectual disability organized pursuant to the provisions
of K.S.A. 19-4001 through 19-4015, and amendments thereto, and
licensed in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and
amendments thereto; (2) community service provider as provided in the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 33
developmental disabilities reform act; or (3) a nonprofit corporation that
provides services for people with intellectual disability pursuant to a
contract with an intellectual disability governing board.
Sec. 16. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 74-3292 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 74-3292. As used in this act:
(a) "Executive officer" means the chief executive officer of the state
board of regents appointed under K.S.A. 74-3203a, and amendments
thereto.
(b) "Mental health or treatment facility" means:
(1) Any private treatment facility as defined in K.S.A. 59-29b46, and
amendments thereto;
(2) any public treatment facility as defined in K.S.A. 59-29b46, and
amendments thereto;
(3) any community mental health center organized pursuant to K.S.A.
19-4001 through 19-4015, and amendments thereto, and licensed pursuant
to K.S.A. 39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(4) any mental health clinic organized pursuant to K.S.A. 65-211
through 65-215, and amendments thereto, and licensed pursuant to K.S.A.
39-2001 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(5) any psychiatric hospital, psychiatric residential treatment facility
or residential care facility as such terms are defined in K.S.A. 39-2002,
and amendments thereto;
(6) any hospital as defined in K.S.A. 65-425, and amendments
thereto, if:
(A) The hospital has a psychiatric unit; and
(B) the scholarship recipient is required to fulfill the nursing service
scholarship's employment obligations as an employee in the psychiatric
unit of the hospital; or
(7) Osawatomie state hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Larned
state hospital, south central regional mental health hospital, Parsons state
hospital and training center or the Kansas neurological institute.
(c) "School of nursing" means a school within the state of Kansas that
is approved by the state board of nursing to grant an associate degree or a
baccalaureate degree in professional nursing or a certificate of completion
in practical nursing and is:
(1) Under the control and supervision of the state board of regents;
(2) a municipal university; or
(3) a not-for-profit independent institution of higher education that
has its main campus or principal place of operation in Kansas, maintains
open enrollment as defined in K.S.A. 74-32,120, and amendments thereto,
and is operated independently and not controlled or administered by the
state or any agency or subdivision thereof.
(d) "Sponsor" means any of the following that is located in a rural

HB 2365—Am. by SC 34
opportunity zone as defined in K.S.A. 74-50,222, and amendments thereto:
(1) An adult care home licensed under the adult care home licensure
act, K.S.A. 39-923 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(2) a medical care facility licensed under K.S.A. 65-425 et seq., and
amendments thereto;
(3) a home health agency licensed under K.S.A. 65-5101 et seq., and
amendments thereto;
(4) a local health department as defined in K.S.A. 65-241, and
amendments thereto;
(5) a mental health or treatment facility; and
(6) a state agency that employs licensed practical nurses or licensed
professional nurses.
Sec. 17. K.S.A. 75-3099 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
3099. (a) The governing board of any educational institution may enter
into agreements with any state agency for the provision of instruction at
the educational institution or off the campus thereof. Credit for such
instruction shall be awarded in accordance with the provisions of the
agreement.
(b) Any state agency may enter into agreements with the governing
board of any educational institution for the provision of instruction at the
educational institution or off the campus thereof. The amount to be paid by
the state agency for the provision of instruction under any such agreement
shall be determined as provided in the agreement, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and in any case within limitations of the
appropriations of the state agency therefor. The amount to be paid under
any such agreement shall be determined on the basis of a fixed dollar
amount for each enrolled credit hour of instruction in lieu of tuition, except
that (1) an additional dollar amount shall be paid for each credit hour value
of a course which is not taught by personnel of the state agency, (2) the
payment to be made under an agreement with a social welfare institution
shall be on the basis of four credit hours for an entry level course of
instruction for direct care staff, and (3) payments may be made to an
educational institution for special training materials and mileage expenses
where appropriate under the circumstances.
(c) (1) No credit hour state aid entitlement and no out-district state aid
entitlement of an educational institution shall be based upon any subject,
course or program which is taught under an agreement with a state agency,
and no such subject, course or program shall be counted in determining the
number of credit hours of out-district students for the purpose of
determining the amount of out-district tuition to be charged by an
educational institution.
(2) No tuition shall be charged to or collected from any person who
enrolls in any subject, course or program which is taught under an

HB 2365—Am. by SC 35
agreement with a state agency.
(d) For the purpose of this section,:
(1) "Educational institution" means community college or municipal
university;
(2) "social welfare institution" means Topeka state hospital,
Osawatomie state hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Larned state
hospital, Parsons state hospital and training center, Norton state hospital,
Winfield state hospital and training center, south central regional mental
health hospital and Kansas neurological institute; and
(3) "state agency" means any state office or officer, department,
board, commission, institution, bureau, or any agency, division or unit
within any office, department, board, commission or other authority of this
state.
Sec. 18. K.S.A. 75-3373 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
3373. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no state agency shall
enter into any agreement or take any action to outsource or privatize any
operations or facilities of the Larned state hospital, the Osawatomie state
hospital, the south central regional mental health hospital or any facility
that provides mental health services and that is operated by a state agency
without prior specific authorization by an act of the legislature or an
appropriation act of the legislature. The restriction imposed by this
subsection applies to any action to outsource or privatize all or any part of
any operation or facility of the Larned state hospital, the Osawatomie state
hospital, the south central regional mental health hospital or any facility
that provides mental health services and that is operated by a state agency,
including, but not limited to, any action to transfer all or any part of the
rated bed capacity at the Larned state hospital or, the Osawatomie state
hospital, or the south central regional mental health hospital, in effect on
the effective date of this act, to another facility.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Kansas department for
aging and disability services from renewing, in substantially the same form
as an existing agreement, any agreement in existence prior to March 4,
2016, for services at the Larned state hospital or the Osawatomie state
hospital.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Kansas department for
aging and disability services from entering into an agreement for services
at the Larned state hospital or the Osawatomie state hospital with a
different provider if such agreement is substantially similar to an
agreement for services in existence prior to March 4, 2016.
Sec. 19. K.S.A. 76-384 is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-384.
(a) Upon the selection of a service commitment area for the purposes of
satisfying a service obligation under a medical student loan agreement
entered into under this act, the person so selecting shall inform the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 36
university of Kansas school of medicine of the service commitment area
selected.
(b) A person serving in a service commitment area pursuant to any
agreement under this act may serve all or part of any commitment in the
service commitment area initially selected by such person. If such person
moves from one service commitment area to another service commitment
area, such person shall notify the university of Kansas school of medicine
of such person's change of service commitment area. Service in any such
service commitment area shall be deemed to be continuous for the purpose
of satisfying any agreement entered into under this act.
(c) A person receiving a medical student loan under this act, may
satisfy the obligation to engage in the full-time practice of medicine and
surgery in a service commitment area if the person serves as a full-time
faculty member of the university of Kansas school of medicine in general
internal medicine, general pediatrics, family medicine, family practice,
general psychiatry or child psychiatry and serves two years for each one
year of such obligation, or the equivalent thereof on a two-for-one basis,
except that, at the time any person commences satisfying such service
obligation as a full-time faculty member pursuant to this subsection, the
number of persons satisfying service commitments or service obligations,
pursuant to agreements under the medical student loan act, as full-time
faculty members pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed the number
equal to 25% of the total number of full-time faculty members of the
university of Kansas school of medicine in general internal medicine,
general pediatrics, family medicine, family practice, general psychiatry or
child psychiatry.
(d) A person may satisfy the obligation to engage in the full-time
practice of medicine and surgery in a service commitment area by
performing at least 100 hours per month of on-site primary care or mental
health care at a medical facility operated by a local health department or
nonprofit organization in this state serving medically indigent persons or at
a community mental health center or at Larned state hospital, Osawatomie
state hospital, south central regional mental health hospital or any facility
that provides mental health services and that is operated by a state agency.
As used in this subsection, "medically indigent" means a person:
(1) Who is unable to secure health care healthcare because of
inability to pay for all or a part of the costs thereof due to inadequate
personal resources, being uninsured, being underinsured, being ineligible
for governmental health benefits; or
(2) who is eligible for governmental benefits but is unable to obtain
medical services; and "primary care" means general pediatrics, general
internal medicine, family medicine and family practice.
Sec. 20. K.S.A. 76-12a01 is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-

HB 2365—Am. by SC 37
12a01. As used in this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Secretary" means the secretary for aging and disability services.
(b) "Institution" means the following institutions: Osawatomie state
hospital, Rainbow mental health facility, Larned state hospital, south
central regional mental health hospital, Parsons state hospital and training
center, and Kansas neurological institute.
(c) "Director" or "commissioner" means the commissioner of
community services and programs.
Sec. 21. K.S.A. 76-12a31 is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-
12a31. From and after October 1, 1996, no institution shall admit any
individual for care or treatment of alcohol abuse or drug abuse with the
exception that Larned state hospital and, Osawatomie state hospital and
south central regional mental health hospital may admit an individual for
detoxification services or alcohol abuse or drug abuse care and treatment
provided to inmates in the custody of the secretary of corrections as
clinically indicated. From and after October 1, 1996, public treatment
facilities and other treatment facilities licensed under K.S.A. 65-4001 et
seq., 65-4601 et seq. or 65-5201 et seq. and amendments thereto as
specified or directed by the secretary or a district court shall admit and
give appropriate care and treatment to alcohol and drug abusers.
Sec. 22. K.S.A. 76-1407 is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-
1407. Any reference in the laws of this state to "Parsons state training
school," "state hospital for epileptics at Parsons" or words of similar
import, shall be deemed to mean the Parsons state hospital and training
center.
Sec. 23. K.S.A. 76-1409 is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-
1409. The object of the Parsons state hospital and training center shall be
to examine, treat, educate, train and rehabilitate the persons admitted and
retained so as to make such persons more comfortable, happy, and better
fitted to care for and support themselves. To this end The secretary shall
provide such examination, treatment, education (, including academic and
vocational), training and rehabilitation facilities as he or she the secretary
shall deem necessary and advisable.
Sec. 24. K.S.A. 76-1409a is hereby amended to read as follows: 76-
1409a. The superintendent of Parsons state hospital and training center
shall remit all moneys received by or for the superintendent from charges
made under K.S.A. 59-2006, and amendments thereto, and other
operations of such institution to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of
each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in
the state treasury to the credit of the Parsons state hospital and training
center fee fund. All expenditures from such fund shall be made in
accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of

HB 2365—Am. by SC 38
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by such
superintendent or by a person or persons designated by the superintendent.
Sec. 25. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-1936 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 76-1936. (a) The commissioner of community services and
programs of the Kansas department for aging and disability services, with
the approval of the secretary for aging and disability services and the
director of the Kansas office of veterans services, may transfer patients in
the state hospitals at Osawatomie and, Larned and patients in the Rainbow
mental health facility, Wichita and the Parsons state hospital and training
center who have served in the military or naval forces of the United States
or whose husband, wife, father, son or daughter has served in the active
military or naval service of the United States during any period of any war
as defined in K.S.A. 76-1908, and amendments thereto, and who was
discharged or relieved therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable,
to the Kansas soldiers' home. No patient who is such a mentally ill person,
as defined in K.S.A. 59-2946, and amendments thereto, in the opinion of
the commissioner of state hospitals, that because of such patient's illness
such patient is likely to injure themselves or others, shall be transferred to
such Kansas soldiers' home, and no such patient shall be transferred if such
transfer will deny admission to persons entitled to admission under K.S.A.
76-1908, and amendments thereto, and rules and regulations promulgated
thereunder. Persons transferred shall not be considered as members of the
Kansas soldiers' home but shall be considered as patients therein.
(b) All of the laws, rules and regulations relating to patients in state
hospitals and mental health facility specified in subsection (a) shall be
applicable to such patients transferred under subsection (a). Any patient
transferred who is found to be or shall become such a mentally ill person,
as defined in K.S.A. 59-2946, and amendments thereto, in the opinion of
the commissioner of state hospitals, that because of such patient's illness
such patient is likely to injure themselves or others or who is determined to
need additional psychiatric treatment, shall be retransferred by the
superintendent of the Kansas soldiers' home, with the approval of the
commissioner of state hospitals and the director of the Kansas office of
veterans services, to the institution from whence the patient was originally
transferred.
Sec. 26. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 76-1958 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 76-1958. (a) The commissioner of state hospitals of the Kansas
department for aging and disability services, with the approval of the
secretary for aging and disability services and the director of the Kansas
office of veterans services, may transfer patients in the state hospitals in
Topeka, Osawatomie and, Larned and patients in the Rainbow mental
health facility, Wichita and the Parsons state hospital and training center
and the Winfield state hospital and training center who have served in the

HB 2365—Am. by SC 39
military or naval forces of the United States or whose husband, wife,
father, son or daughter has served in the active military or naval service of
the United States during any period of any war as defined in K.S.A. 76-
1954, and amendments thereto, and was discharged or relieved therefrom
under conditions other than dishonorable, to the Kansas veterans' home.
No patient who is such a mentally ill person, as defined in K.S.A. 59-2946,
and amendments thereto, in the opinion of the commissioner of state
hospitals, that because of such patient's illness such patient is likely to
injure oneself or others shall be so transferred to such Kansas veterans'
home, and no such patient shall be so transferred if such transfer will deny
admission to persons entitled to admission under K.S.A. 76-1954, and
amendments thereto, and rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Persons transferred shall not be considered as members of the Kansas
veterans' home but shall be considered as patients.
(b) All of the laws, rules and regulations relating to patients in the
above-specified state hospitals and mental health facilities shall be
applicable to such patients so transferred insofar as the same can be made
applicable. Any patient so transferred who is found to be or shall become
such a mentally ill person, as defined in K.S.A. 59-2946, and amendments
thereto, in the opinion of the commissioner of state hospitals, that because
of such patient's illness such patient is likely to injure oneself or others or
who is determined to need additional psychiatric treatment, shall be
retransferred by the superintendent of the Kansas veterans' home, with the
approval of the commissioner of mental health and developmental
disabilities and the director of the Kansas office of veterans services, to the
institution from which the patient was originally transferred.
Sec. 27. K.S.A. 21-5413, 39-1602, 39-1613, 40-3401, 41-1126, 65-
4921, 65-5601, 75-3099, 75-3373, 76-384, 76-12a01, 76-12a31, 76-1407,
76-1409 and 76-1409a and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 39-1401, 59-2006b, 59-
2946, 59-29b46, 59-29b54, 59-29b57, 59-3077, 74-3292, 76-1936 and 76-
1958 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 28. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.